South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S103.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 47-17-510 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 47-17-510. (A) A person who advertises, offers for sale, or sells all or part of a carcass shall not engage in any misleading or deceptive practices, labeling, or misrepresenting a product as "meat" or "clean meat" that is cell-cultured meat/protein, or is not derived from harvested production livestock, poultry, fish, or crustaceans. For the purposes of this section: (1) "artificial or cell-cultivated food product" means any food product developed in a laboratory or facility and grown from a biopsy of living animal cells including, but not limited to, livestock, poultry, fish, crustaceans, or other animal protein; and (2) "sells, or holds or offers for sale" does not include retail sales except under the circumstances where a retailer is also the manufacturer. (B) It shall be unlawful for any person to label any artificial or cell-cultivated food product as beef, poultry, fish, crustacean, or any other animal protein that the artificial or cell-cultivated food product may resemble for the purposes of advertising,  manufacturing, selling, or holding or offering for sale in this State. (C) No person who advertises, manufactures, sells, or holds or offers for sale any artificial or cell-cultivated food product in this State shall engage in a misleading or deceptive practice related to an artificial or cell-cultivated food product including, but not limited to, misrepresenting an artificial or cell-cultivated food product as being derived from harvested production beef, poultry, fish, crustacean, or other animal protein. The front of all artificial or cell-cultivated food product packaging must contain a conspicuous label that indicates that the artificial or cell-cultivated food product is not beef, poultry, fish, crustacean, or any other animal protein that the artificial or cell-cultivated food product may resemble. (D) Each package that violates a provision of this section shall be a separate and distinct offense. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----